Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.038

Sports wagering—Defined.

(1)(a) For purposes of this chapter, "sports wagering" means the business of accepting wagers on any of the following sporting events, athletic events, or competitions by any system or method of wagering:

(i) A professional sport or athletic event;

(ii) A collegiate sport or athletic event;

(iii) An Olympic or international sports competition or event;

(iv) An electronic sports or esports competition or event;

(v) A combination of sporting events, athletic events, or competitions listed in (a)(i) through (iv) of this subsection (1); or

(vi) A portion of any sporting event, athletic event, or competition listed in (a)(i) through (iv) of this subsection (1).

(b) Sports wagering does not include the business of accepting wagers on horse racing authorized pursuant to chapter 67.16 RCW.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Collegiate sport or athletic event" means a sport or athletic event offered or sponsored by, or played in connection with, a public or private institution that offers education services beyond the secondary level, other than such an institution that is located within the state of Washington.

(b) "Electronic or esports event" means a live event or tournament attended or watched by members of the public where games or matches are contested in real time by players and teams and players or teams can win a prize based on their performance in the live event or tournament.

(c) "Professional sport or athletic event" means an event that is not a collegiate sport or athletic event at which two or more persons participate in sports or athletic events and receive compensation in excess of actual expenses for their participation in the event. "Professional sport or athletic event" does not include any minor league sport. Sports wagering may not be conducted on any minor league sport.

[ 2020 c 127 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 127: See notes following RCW 9.46.0364.